Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1332DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1332DP (1) 91
as/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 11.6, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 7A. Upon notification of any suspected
misuse of public funds as described in subsection 7, the
certified public accountant and the governmental subdivision
shall cooperate with the auditor of state to establish
procedures to investigate the suspected embezzlement, theft,
or other significant financial irregularities. The auditor
of state shall determine if the auditor of state will perform
subsequent further procedures. The governmental subdivision
shall reimburse the auditor of state for any actions taken by
the auditor of state to investigate the suspected embezzlement,
theft, or other significant financial irregularities. The
costs assessed shall not exceed the amount of the public funds
misused as determined by the auditor.